dev/he.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>אבגדהוזחטיכךלמםנןסעפףצץקרשת•ﭏ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"            c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"           c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"          c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"          c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="f"            c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="subj"         c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="p1"           c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="m"            c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="mf"           c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="sg"           c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="pl"           c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="cons"          c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px1sg"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px1pl"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg_m"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg_f"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl_m"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl_f"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg_m"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg_f"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl_m"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl_f"      c="Noun"/>

    <sdef n="def"      c="Noun"/>

    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"      c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p>          <l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p>          <l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="ללא__pr">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="ה">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r>ה<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e><p><l>אני</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>אנחנו</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>אנו</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->  

    <pardef n="פני/יה__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ית</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתי</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתנו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתכם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתכן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתה</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיי</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותינו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותייך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיה</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="הזדכו/ת__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ת</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ת</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תי</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תנו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תה</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיי</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותינו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותייך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיכם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיכן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיהן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיה</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיהם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="אחר"><i>אחר</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="אחרי"><i>אחרי</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="אל"><i>אל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="אצל"><i>אצל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="את"><i>את</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ב־"><i>ב־</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="באשר"><i>באשר</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בגלל"><i>בגלל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בין"><i>בין</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="במקום"><i>במקום</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בעצם"><i>בעצם</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בשביל"><i>בשביל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בשל"><i>בשל</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="בתוך"><i>בתוך</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="דרך"><i>דרך</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="חוץ מ־"><i>חוץ<b/>מ־</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="כ־"><i>כ־</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="כדי"><i>כדי</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="כמו"><i>כמו</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ל־"><i>ל־</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ליד"><i>ליד</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ללא"><i>ללא</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="למרות"><i>למרות</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="לפני"><i>לפני</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="מאז"><i>מאז</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="מול עיני"><i>מול<b/>עיני</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="מן"><i>מן</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="נגד"><i>נגד</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="על"><i>על</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ע״ש"><i>ע״ש</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="של־"><i>של־</i><par n="ללא__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="הולדת"><par n="ה"/><i>הולדת</i><par n="עת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="סרט"><par n="ה"/><i>סרט</i><par n="שק__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="התמתנות"><i>התמתנו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התכתבות"><i>התכתבו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="נטייה"><i>נטי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="אפייה"><i>אפי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היבלעות"><i>היבלעו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התנדנדות"><i>התנדנדו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פצייה"><i>פצי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היזכרות"><i>היזכרו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התאהבות"><i>התאהבו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתמרות"><i>הסתמרו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ירייה"><i>ירי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="רווייה"><i>רווי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היפגמות"><i>היפגמו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פלייה"><i>פלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היחטפות"><i>היחטפו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="תהייה"><i>תהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="זרייה"><i>זרי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היכנעות"><i>היכנעו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתמררות"><i>הסתמררו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פדייה"><i>פדי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היאחזות"><i>היאחזו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שבייה"><i>שבי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פשייה"><i>פשי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="בלייה"><i>בלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התגברות"><i>התגברו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="כפייה"><i>כפי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התבסמות"><i>התבסמו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="בכייה"><i>בכי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הזדככות"><i>הזדככו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="קהייה"><i>קהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התעדנות"><i>התעדנו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתגלות"><i>הסתגלו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="דהייה"><i>דהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="כלייה"><i>כלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתממות"><i>הסתממו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="צפייה"><i>צפי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="געייה"><i>געי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היתחבות"><i>היתחבו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התפקעות"><i>התפקעו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ראייה"><i>ראי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היסמכות"><i>היסמכו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="טווייה"><i>טווי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התמצאות"><i>התמצאו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="נהייה"><i>נהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שהייה"><i>שהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היוורשות"><i>היוורשו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="תלייה"><i>תלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="עטייה"><i>עטי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הישתלות"><i>הישתלו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חצייה"><i>חצי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הישזרות"><i>הישזרו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="טעייה"><i>טעי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התנגדות"><i>התנגדו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="לקייה"><i>לקי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חנייה"><i>חני</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התחלות"><i>התחלו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שרייה"><i>שרי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התבשמות"><i>התבשמו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="מנייה"><i>מני</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התרגשות"><i>התרגשו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התרוקנות"><i>התרוקנו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
